incubator/apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="хто__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хто</l>
          <r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кого</l>
          <r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кому</l>
          <r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кого</l>
          <r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ким</l>
          <r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кому</l>
          <r>хто<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="що__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>що</l>
          <r>що<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>чого</l>
          <r>що<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>чому</l>
          <r>що<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>що</l>
          <r>що<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>чим</l>
          <r>що<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>чому</l>
          <r>що<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="хто"><i></i><par n="хто__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="що"><i></i><par n="що__det"/></e>
